Massachusetts, session 194th, H1751.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Definitions
As used in this act and sections 2 through 8, inclusive:
"Name" refers to the actual or assumed name of a living or deceased individual used to
identify that individual.
"Persona" means the name, voice, distinctive mannerisms and gestures, signature,
photograph, or likeness of an individual, or any element thereof.
"Right of publicity" means the property right in an individual's persona for a commercial
or fundraising purpose.
Section 2. Right of Publicity
Each individual shall have a right of publicity in their persona, which shall be freely
transferable, assignable, and licensable by means of inter vivos or testamentary transfer,
of 4

including by will, trust, contract, or other permissible mechanisms. This right shall survive the
individual’s death and shall apply regardless of whether the right was exploited during the
individual's lifetime.
Section 3. Unauthorized Use Prohibited
No person may use any aspect of an individual’s right of publicity for the following
purposes without prior written consent of the individual or their authorized representative during
their lifetime or for seventy years after their death:
For commercial purposes, including product or service advertising.
For fundraising or soliciting donations.
To digitally or otherwise alter the individual’s persona in a manner that:
Causes the individual to appear to say or do things they did not consent to, or
Places the individual in a false context or situation.
Unauthorized use constitutes infringement, regardless of whether the use is for profit or
nonprofit purposes.
Section 4. Civil Actions
(a) The following parties may bring a civil action for violations of this act:
Owners of the right of publicity.
Licensees with express written authorization.
Transferees of the right of publicity.
of 4

(b) Before initiating an action, partial owners must notify others with ownership interests
and provide an opportunity to object. Notification may be delivered by mail or published in a
newspaper with general circulation in the municipality where the individual resides or, for
deceased individuals, where their estate was probated.
(c) An objection must be filed within 20 days of mailed notice or 60 days of published
notice. If no objection is made, the right to object is waived.
(d) Civil actions are prohibited if parties collectively owning more than 50% of the right
of publicity object.
(e) Partial owners initiating an action must account for recoveries to other interest
holders, less reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.
Section 5. Remedies and Damages
(a) Massachusetts Superior Courts may issue injunctive relief, including temporary
restraining orders and permanent injunctions.
(b) Violators are liable for the greater of $2,000 or actual damages, plus any profits
directly attributable to the infringement. Statutory damages may consider a single act of
infringement as one violation, regardless of the number of reproductions or distributions.
(c) Courts may impound materials made or used in violation of this act and order their
destruction upon final judgment.
(d) Courts may award prevailing parties reasonable attorney’s fees and litigation costs.
Section 6. Exceptions
of 4

The following uses are exempt from this act:
Bona fide news or public affairs reporting.
Portrayals of public officials or political candidates, unless for commercial purposes
without consent.
Reporting of public interest events or topics.
Original works of fine art.
Literary works, theatrical works, and similar creative expressions, unless electronically or
digitally altered to distort consent.
Truthful identification of authors or performers.
Promotional material for exempt works under this section.
Section 7. Jurisdiction
This act applies to all acts occurring in the Commonwealth of Massachusetts, regardless
of the individual’s domicile, residence, or citizenship.
Section 8. Additional Rights
The rights and remedies provided by this act are cumulative and do not preempt other
rights or remedies available under Massachusetts law.
Section 9.
This bill shall take effect upon passage
of 4